Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1254.04
Boating under influence of alcoholic liquor or drug; unconscious; effect on consent.

Any person who is unconscious or who is otherwise in a condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal shall be deemed not to have withdrawn the consent provided by section 37-1254.02, and the test may be given.

Laws 1989, LB 195, § 6.